Missouri, session 2026, SB1242.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 595, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 595.047, to read as
follows:
595.047. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Missouri Crime Victims Fund", which shall
consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and
any gifts, contributions, grants, or other donations from
any public or private source. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this
section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any

SB 1242 2
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. Moneys in the Missouri crime victims fund shall be
disbursed to entitlement jurisdictions, eligible entities,
or local governmental entities that are eligible for victim
assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act,
Pub. L. 98-473, and related regulations, and such
jurisdictions and entities shall use such moneys for the
same purposes as an entitlement jurisdiction, eligible
entity, or local governmental entity may use victim
assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act,
Pub. L. 98-473, and related regulations.
✓